Maine, session 132, LD2061.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §9420, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 226, §1, is amended
by enacting a new first blocked paragraph to read:
For purposes of this subsection, "billing statement" means a monthly or periodic account
statement that a person is required to provide to a customer under federal or state law,
regulation or rule. This subsection does not prohibit a person from charging a reasonable
fee for providing a replacement statement, a statement covering a custom date range or a
statement requested for financial or legal purposes or for fulfilling any other labor-intensive
or nonroutine request to provide copies of statements, as long as the fee is fully disclosed
to and authorized by the customer prior to the copies being provided.
Page 1 - 132LR2743(03)

Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2743(03)